task.lexd
PATTERNS

S(1) I(1) S(2) :I(2) S(3) I(2):



LEXICON S(3)

k t b # to write

ɦ ṛ b # to run away

ʃ ṛ b # to drink

x r ʒ # to go out

d x l # to get in

k m i # to smoke

x w i # to empty



LEXICON I(2)

:ə <v><caus>:{d}ə

: <v>:ə
